Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1678.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1101(a) of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 1101. Imposition of Tax.--(a) General Rule.--Every 123456789101112131415161718 pipeline company, conduit company, steamboat company, canal company, slack water navigation company, transportation company, and every other company, association, joint-stock association, or limited partnership, now or hereafter incorporated or organized by or under any law of this Commonwealth, or now or hereafter organized or incorporated by any other state or by the United States or any foreign government, and doing business in this Commonwealth, and every copartnership, person or persons owing, operating or leasing to or from another corporation, company, association, joint-stock association, limited partnership, copartnership, person or persons, any pipeline, conduit, steamboat, canal, slack water navigation, or other device for the transportation of freight, passengers, baggage, or oil, except motor vehicles and railroads, and every limited partnership, association, joint-stock association, corporation or company engaged in, or hereinafter engaged in, the transportation of freight or oil within this State, and every telephone company, telegraph company or provider of mobile telecommunications services now or hereafter incorporated or organized by or under any law of this Commonwealth, or now or hereafter organized or incorporated by any other state or by the United States or any foreign government and doing business in this Commonwealth, and every limited partnership, association, joint-stock association, copartnership, person or persons, engaged in telephone or telegraph business or providing mobile telecommunications services in this Commonwealth, and every limited partnership, association, joint-stock association, corporation or company providing digital advertising services in this Commonwealth, shall pay to the State Treasurer, through the Department of Revenue, a tax of forty-five mills with a surtax 20250HB1678PN3551 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 equal to five mills upon each dollar of the gross receipts of the corporation, company or association, limited partnership, joint-stock association, copartnership, person or persons received from:(1) passengers, baggage, oil and freight transported wholly within this State;(2) telegraph or telephone messages transmitted wholly within this State and telegraph or telephone messages transmitted in interstate commerce where such messages originate or terminate in this State and the charges for such messages are billed to a service address in this State, except gross receipts derived from:(i) the sales of access to the Internet, as set forth in Article II, made to the ultimate consumer;(ii) the sales for resale to persons, partnerships, associations, corporations, or political subdivisions subject to the tax imposed by this article upon gross receipts derived from such resale of telecommunications services, including:(A) telecommunications exchange access to interconnect with a local exchange carrier's network;(B) network elements on an unbundled basis; and(C) sales of telecommunications services to interconnect with providers of mobile telecommunications services; and(iii) the sales of telephones, telephone handsets, modems, tablets and related accessories, including cases, chargers, holsters, clips, hands-free devices, screen protectors and batteries; [and](3) mobile telecommunications services messages sourced to this Commonwealth based on the place of primary use standard set forth in the Mobile Telecommunications Sourcing Act (4 U.S.C. § 20250HB1678PN3551 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 117), except gross receipts derived from:(i) the sales of access to the Internet, as set forth in Article II, made to the ultimate consumer;(ii) the sales for resale to persons, partnerships, associations, corporations or political subdivisions subject to the tax imposed by this article upon gross receipts derived from such resale of mobile telecommunications services, including sales of mobile telecommunications services to interconnect with providers of telecommunications services; and(iii) the sales of telephones, telephone handsets, modems, tablets and related accessories, including cases, chargers, holsters, clips, hands-free devices, screen protectors and batteries[.]; and(4) digital advertising services displayed to a user on a digital interface wholly within this Commonwealth, including banner advertising, search engine advertising, interstitial advertising and comparable advertising services that utilize the personal information of the users to whom the advertisements are served. As used in this clause, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this clause:"D igital advertising services." The provision of advertisements displayed on a digital interface."Digital interface." Any software, including an Internet website, part of an Internet website or application, accessible to a user."User." An individual or other person accessing a digital interface via a device.* * *(g.1) Exemption for Broadcast and News Media Entities.--The tax imposed under this section on gross receipts derived from 20250HB1678PN3551 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 digital advertising services shall not however be imposed on gross receipts from advertising services displayed on a digital interface owned or operated by a broadcast entity or news media entity. As used in this subsection, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection:"B roadcast entity." An entity primarily engaged in operating a broadcast television or radio station."Digital advertising services." As defined in subsection (a)(4)."Digital interface." As defined in subsection (a)(4)."News media entity." An entity primarily engaged in newsgathering, reporting or publishing articles or commentary on news, current events, culture or other matters of public interest.* * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XXIX-JADDITIONAL PROPERTY TAX REBATESection 2901-J. Definitions."Account." The restricted account established under section 2902-J."Claimant." An individual who files an application for the rebate authorized under section 2903-J who has filed a claim for property tax and:(1) is an eligible individual; or(2) lives in the same household as an eligible individual."Department." The Department of Revenue of the Commonwealth."Eligible individual." An individual who resides in a 20250HB1678PN3551 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 homestead and is at least 65 years of age."Homestead." A dwelling and so much of the land surrounding it, as is reasonably necessary for the use of the dwelling as a home, occupied by a claimant. The term includes:(1) Premises occupied by reason of ownership or lease in a cooperative housing corporation.(2) Mobile homes which are assessed as realty for local property tax purposes and the land, if owned or rented by the claimant, upon which the mobile home is situated, and other similar living accommodations.(3) A part of a multidwelling or multipurpose building and a part of the land upon which the dwelling or building is built.(4) Premises occupied by reason of the claimant's ownership of a dwelling located on land owned by a nonprofit incorporated association, of which the claimant is a member, if the claimant is required to pay a pro rata share of the property taxes levied against the association's land.(5) Premises occupied by a claimant if the claimant is required by law to pay a property tax by reason of the claimant's ownership, including a possessory interest, in the dwelling, the land or both. An owner includes a person in possession under a contract of sale, deed of trust, life estate, joint tenancy or tenancy in common or by reason of statutes of descent and distribution."Property Tax Relief Fund." The Property Tax Relief Fund established under 4 Pa.C.S. § 1409 (relating to property tax relief fund)."Real property taxes." All taxes on a homestead, exclusive of municipal assessments, delinquent charges and interest, due 20250HB1678PN3551 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and payable during a calendar year."Rebate." The rebate authorized under section 2903-J.Section 2902-J. Account established.There shall be established within the Property Tax Relief Fund a restricted account for the purpose of paying the rebates under section 2903-J. All of the money collected under section 1101(a)(4) shall be deposited into the account.Section 2903-J. Additional property tax rebate.(a) Eligibility.--In addition to the rebate authorized under Chapter 13 of the act of June 27, 2006 (1st Sp.Sess., P.L.1873, No.1), known as the Taxpayer Relief Act, a claimant shall be eligible to receive a rebate under this article.(b) Amount of rebate.-- Each approved claimant shall receive a rebate in an amount equal to the amount levied under Chapter 3 of the Taxpayer Relief Act in the current fiscal year less the amount levied under Chapter 3 of the Taxpayer Relief Act in the year the claimant turned 64 years of age, or if the claimant is not at least 65 years of age, the amount levied under Chapter 3 of the Taxpayer Relief Act in the year the eligible individual residing in the claimant's homestead turned 64 years of age.(B) AMOUNT OF REBATE.--EACH APPROVED CLAIMANT SHALL RECEIVE A REBATE IN AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO THE AMOUNT OF LOCAL SCHOOL REAL ESTATE TAXES PAID BY THE APPROVED CLAIMANT IN THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR LESS THE AMOUNT PAID IN THE YEAR THE CLAIMANT TURNED 64 YEARS OF AGE, OR IF THE CLAIMANT IS NOT AT LEAST 65 YEARS OF AGE, THE AMOUNT PAID IN THE YEAR THE ELIGIBLE INDIVIDUAL RESIDING IN THE CLAIMANT'S HOMESTEAD TURNED 64 YEARS OF AGE.Section 2904-J. Filing and payment of claim.(a) Filing.--Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b), a claim for a rebate under this article shall be filed with the 20250HB1678PN3551 - 7 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 department on or before the 30th day of June of the year next succeeding the end of the calendar year in which real property taxes was due and payable.(b) Payments from account.--Except as provided under subsection (c)(3), no reimbursement on a claim shall be made from the account earlier than the day following the 30th day of June provided under this section on which that claim may be filed with the department.(c) Eligibility of claimants.--(1) Only one claimant from a homestead each year shall be entitled to the rebate.(2) If two or more people are able to meet the qualifications for a claimant, the individuals may determine who the claimant shall be.(3) If the individuals are unable to agree, the department shall determine to whom the rebate is to be paid.Section 2905-J. Proof of claim.(a) Contents.--Each claim shall be submitted on a form and in a manner established by the department and shall include:(1) The size and nature of the property claimed as a homestead.(2) The tax receipt or other proof that the real property taxes on the homestead have been paid.(3) Certification that the claimant or an individual in the claimant's household is 65 years of age or older.(b) Direct payment of taxes not required.--It shall not be necessary that taxes were paid directly by the claimant if the taxes have been paid when the claim is filed.Section 2906-J. Incorrect claim.Whenever on audit of a claim the department finds the claim 20250HB1678PN3551 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to have been incorrectly determined, it shall redetermine the correct amount of the claim and notify the claimant of the reason for the redetermination and the amount of the corrected claim.Section 2907-J. Funds for payment of claims.Approved claims shall be paid from the account.Section 3. The amendment of section 1101(a) of the act shall apply to the taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025.Section 4. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1678PN3551 - 9 - 123456789